Maryland, session 2025, HB1503.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
9–1001.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
– 1 –

Ch. 606 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(B) “APPLICATION YEAR” MEANS THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING ON
THE SUNDAY OF THE CALENDAR WEEK FOR WHICH PAID FAMILY AND MEDICAL
LEAVE IS APPROVED IN WHICH LEAVE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE BEGINS.
(C) “DEPLOYMENT” MEANS A SERVICE MEMBER ACTING UNDER OFFICIAL
ORDERS WHO, ON ANY DAY, IS PERFORMING SERVICE IN A TRAINING EXERCISE OR
OPERATION AT A LOCATION OR UNDER CIRCUMSTANCES THAT MAKE IT IMPOSSIBLE
OR INFEASIBLE FOR THE SERVICE MEMBER TO SPEND OFF–DUTY TIME IN THE
HOUSING IN WHICH THE SERVICE MEMBER RESIDES WHEN ON GARRISON DUTY AT
THE SERVICE MEMBER’S PERMANENT DUTY STATION OR HOME PORT.
(D) “FAMILY MEMBER” MEANS:
(1) A BIOLOGICAL CHILD, AN ADOPTED CHILD, A FOSTER CHILD, OR A
STEPCHILD OF THE EMPLOYEE;
(2) A CHILD FOR WHOM THE EMPLOYEE HAS LEGAL OR PHYSICAL
CUSTODY OR GUARDIANSHIP;
(3) A CHILD FOR WHOM THE EMPLOYEE STANDS IN LOCO PARENTIS,
REGARDLESS OF THE CHILD’S AGE;
(4) A BIOLOGICAL PARENT, AN ADOPTIVE PARENT, A FOSTER PARENT,
OR A STEPPARENT OF THE EMPLOYEE OR OF THE EMPLOYEE’S SPOUSE;
(5) THE LEGAL GUARDIAN OF THE EMPLOYEE OR THE WARD OF THE
EMPLOYEE OR OF THE EMPLOYEE’S SPOUSE;
(6) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO ACTED AS A PARENT OR STOOD IN LOCO
PARENTIS TO THE EMPLOYEE OR THE EMPLOYEE’S SPOUSE WHEN THE EMPLOYEE
OR THE EMPLOYEE’S SPOUSE WAS A MINOR;
(7) THE SPOUSE OF THE EMPLOYEE;
(8) A DOMESTIC PARTNER OF THE EMPLOYEE;
(9) A BIOLOGICAL GRANDPARENT, AN ADOPTIVE GRANDPARENT, A
FOSTER GRANDPARENT, OR A STEPGRANDPARENT OF THE EMPLOYEE;
(10) A BIOLOGICAL GRANDCHILD, AN ADOPTED GRANDCHILD, A
FOSTER GRANDCHILD, OR A STEPGRANDCHILD OF THE EMPLOYEE; OR
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 606
(11) A BIOLOGICAL SIBLING, AN ADOPTED SIBLING, A FOSTER SIBLING,
OR A STEPSIBLING OF THE EMPLOYEE.
(E) “PAID FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE” MEANS LEAVE FROM WORK TAKEN
UNDER § 9–1004(A)(1) OF THIS SUBTITLE THAT IS PAID AT THE EMPLOYEE’S
REGULAR RATE OF PAY.
(F) “QUALIFYING EXIGENCY” MEANS ANY OF THE FOLLOWING REASONS
FOR WHICH LEAVE MAY BE NEEDED BY A FAMILY MEMBER OF A SERVICE MEMBER:
(1) THE SERVICE MEMBER HAS RECEIVED NOTICE OF DEPLOYMENT
WITHIN 7 DAYS BEFORE THE DEPLOYMENT IS TO BEGIN;
(2) TO ATTEND MILITARY EVENTS AND RELATED ACTIVITIES
INCLUDING FAMILY SUPPORT PROGRAMS RELATED TO THE ACTIVE DUTY OF THE
SERVICE MEMBER;
(3) TO ARRANGE, PROVIDE, OR ATTEND CHILD CARE OR SCHOOL
ACTIVITIES ONLY WHEN THE SERVICE MEMBER IS ON ACTIVE DUTY CALL OR ACTIVE
DUTY STATUS;
(4) TO MAKE FINANCIAL AND LEGAL ARRANGEMENTS FOR THE
SERVICE MEMBER’S ABSENCE OR BECAUSE OF THE ABSENCE;
(5) TO ATTEND COUNSELING THAT:
(I) IS NEEDED DUE TO THE ACTIVE DUTY OR CALL TO ACTIVE
DUTY STATUS OF THE SERVICE MEMBER; AND
(II) IS PROVIDED BY AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS NOT A LICENSED
HEALTH CARE PROVIDER;
(6) TO SPEND UP TO 15 CALENDAR DAYS WITH A SERVICE MEMBER
WHO IS ON SHORT–TERM TEMPORARY REST AND RECUPERATION LEAVE DURING
THE PERIOD OF DEPLOYMENT;
(7) TO ATTEND POSTDEPLOYMENT ACTIVITIES INCLUDING
REINTEGRATION SERVICES FOR A PERIOD OF 90 DAYS IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING
THE TERMINATION OF ACTIVE STATUS;
(8) TO ATTEND TO MATTERS RELATED TO THE DEATH OF THE
SERVICE MEMBER WHILE ON ACTIVE DUTY STATUS;
– 3 –

Ch. 606 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(9) TO ARRANGE FOR OR PROVIDE ALTERNATIVE CARE FOR A PARENT
OF THE SERVICE MEMBER WHEN THE PARENT IS INCAPABLE OF SELF–CARE AND THE
COVERED ACTIVE DUTY OR CALL TO ACTIVE DUTY NECESSITATES A CHANGE; OR
(10) ANY OTHER ISSUES THAT ARISE OUT OF ACTIVE DUTY OR A CALL
TO ACTIVE DUTY THAT AN APPOINTING AUTHORITY AND EMPLOYEE AGREE SHOULD
BE COVERED.
(G) (1) “SERIOUS HEALTH CONDITION” MEANS AN ILLNESS, AN INJURY,
AN IMPAIRMENT, OR A PHYSICAL OR MENTAL CONDITION THAT INVOLVES:
(I) INPATIENT CARE IN A HOSPITAL, HOSPICE, OR RESIDENTIAL
HEALTH CARE FACILITY;
(II) CONTINUED TREATMENT BY A LICENSED HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER; OR
(III) CONTINUED TREATMENT OR SUPERVISION AT HOME BY A
LICENSED HEALTH CARE PROVIDER OR OTHER COMPETENT INDIVIDUAL UNDER
THE SUPERVISION OF A LICENSED HEALTH CARE PROVIDER.
(2) “SERIOUS HEALTH CONDITION” INCLUDES AN ILLNESS, AN
INJURY, AN IMPAIRMENT, OR A PHYSICAL OR MENTAL CONDITION DESCRIBED IN
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION THAT CONTINUES OVER AN EXTENDED
PERIOD OF TIME AND REQUIRES INTERMITTENT TREATMENT.
(H) “SERVICE MEMBER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS AN ACTIVE DUTY OR
FORMER MEMBER OF:
(1) THE UNITED STATES ARMED FORCES;
(2) A RESERVE COMPONENT OF THE UNITED STATES ARMED FORCES;
OR
(3) THE NATIONAL GUARD OF ANY STATE.
(I) “TREATMENT” INCLUDES:
(1) EXAMINATIONS OR TESTING TO DETERMINE THE EXTENT TO
WHICH A SERIOUS HEALTH CONDITION EXISTS OR PERSISTS;
(2) ONGOING OR PERIODIC EVALUATIONS OF THE SERIOUS HEALTH
CONDITION; AND
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 606
(3) ACTUAL TREATMENT BY A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER.
9–1002.
THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES TO ALL EMPLOYEES, INCLUDING TEMPORARY
EMPLOYEES, OF ALL UNITS IN THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH OF STATE GOVERNMENT
ONLY, INCLUDING ANY UNIT WITH AN INDEPENDENT PERSONNEL SYSTEM.
9–1003.
(A) THE SECRETARY, OR THE GOVERNING BODY OF A PUBLIC INSTITUTION
OF HIGHER EDUCATION, SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS GOVERNING PAID FAMILY AND
MEDICAL LEAVE BENEFITS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING REGULATIONS THAT
ESTABLISH CONDITIONS AND PROCEDURES FOR REQUESTING AND APPROVING PAID
FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE TO THE EXTENT THAT THE REGULATIONS DO NOT
CONFLICT WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE SECRETARY, OR THE GOVERNING BODY OF A PUBLIC INSTITUTION
OF HIGHER EDUCATION, MAY DELEGATE TO AN EMPLOYEE OF THE DEPARTMENT OR
AN APPOINTING AUTHORITY ANY POWER OR DUTY THAT IS REASONABLE AND
PROPER FOR THE ADMINISTRATION OF THIS TITLE.
(C) IF AN EMPLOYEE TAKES LEAVE FROM WORK UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, THE
APPOINTING AUTHORITY, ON THE EXPIRATION OF THE LEAVE, SHALL RESTORE THE
EMPLOYEE TO THE SAME OR AN EQUIVALENT POSITION OF EMPLOYMENT.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL FILE QUARTERLY QUARTERLY
INFORMATIONAL WAGE AND HOUR REPORTS SHALL BE FILED WITH THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR THAT PROVIDE THE AMOUNT OF WAGES AND HOURS
WORKED FOR EACH EMPLOYEE FOR EACH WEEK IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING
CALENDAR QUARTER.
9–1004.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, BEGINNING
JULY 1, 2026, AN EMPLOYEE MAY SUBMIT A REQUEST TO THE DEPARTMENT
EMPLOYEE’S APPOINTING AUTHORITY FOR PAID FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH ESTABLISHED PROCEDURES:
(I) 1. TO CARE FOR A NEWBORN CHILD OF THE EMPLOYEE
DURING THE FIRST YEAR AFTER THE CHILD’S BIRTH; OR
– 5 –

Ch. 606 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. BECAUSE A CHILD IS BEING PLACED FOR ADOPTION,
FOSTER CARE, OR KINSHIP CARE WITH THE EMPLOYEE OR TO CARE FOR OR BOND
WITH THE CHILD DURING THE FIRST YEAR AFTER THE PLACEMENT;
(II) TO CARE FOR A FAMILY MEMBER WITH A SERIOUS HEALTH
CONDITION;
(III) TO ATTEND TO A SERIOUS HEALTH CONDITION THAT
RESULTS IN THE EMPLOYEE BEING UNABLE TO PERFORM THE FUNCTIONS OF THE
EMPLOYEE’S POSITION;
(IV) TO CARE FOR A SERVICE MEMBER WITH A SERIOUS HEALTH
CONDITION RESULTING FROM MILITARY SERVICE FOR WHOM THE EMPLOYEE IS
NEXT OF KIN; OR
(V) TO ATTEND TO A QUALIFYING EXIGENCY ARISING OUT OF
THE DEPLOYMENT OF A SERVICE MEMBER WHO IS A FAMILY MEMBER OF THE
EMPLOYEE.
(2) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, IF THE NEED TO USE LEAVE IS FORESEEABLE, AN APPOINTING
AUTHORITY MAY REQUIRE AN EMPLOYEE TAKING LEAVE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE MAY
BE REQUIRED TO PROVIDE THE APPOINTING AUTHORITY WITH WRITTEN NOTICE OF
THE EMPLOYEE’S INTENTION TO TAKE LEAVE AT LEAST 30 DAYS BEFORE
COMMENCING THE LEAVE.
(II) IF THE NEED TO USE LEAVE IS NOT FORESEEABLE, THE
EMPLOYEE SHALL:
1. PROVIDE NOTICE TO THE APPOINTING AUTHORITY AS
SOON AS PRACTICABLE; AND
2. GENERALLY COMPLY WITH THE APPOINTING
AUTHORITY’S NOTICE OR PROCEDURAL REQUIREMENTS FOR REQUESTING OR
REPORTING OTHER LEAVE IF THOSE REQUIREMENTS DO NOT INTERFERE WITH THE
EMPLOYEE’S ABILITY TO USE LEAVE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN
INDIVIDUAL MAY FILE AN APPLICATION FOR LEAVE WITHIN 60 DAYS BEFORE THE
ANTICIPATED START DATE OF THE LEAVE BUT NOT LATER THAN 60 DAYS AFTER THE
START DATE OF THE LEAVE.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 606
(2) TO BE CONSIDERED COMPLETE, AN APPLICATION SHALL CONTAIN
ALL INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(3) (I) THE DEPARTMENT EMPLOYEE’S APPOINTING AUTHORITY
SHALL WAIVE THE FILING DEADLINE ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE WAIVED FOR GOOD CAUSE.
(II) IF THE EMPLOYEE DOES NOT HAVE GOOD CAUSE FOR THE
DELAY IN COMPLETING THE APPLICATION, THE SECRETARY EMPLOYEE’S
APPOINTING AUTHORITY MAY DENY LEAVE LEAVE MAY BE DENIED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE.
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN
EMPLOYEE MAY TAKE THE LEAVE FOR WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL IS ELIGIBLE UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION ON AN INTERMITTENT LEAVE SCHEDULE.
(2) IF LEAVE IS TAKEN ON AN INTERMITTENT LEAVE SCHEDULE, THE
EMPLOYEE SHALL:
(I) MAKE A REASONABLE EFFORT TO SCHEDULE THE
INTERMITTENT LEAVE IN A MANNER THAT DOES NOT UNDULY DISRUPT
OPERATIONS; AND
(II) PROVIDE THE APPOINTING AUTHORITY WITH REASONABLE
AND PRACTICABLE PRIOR NOTICE OF THE REASON FOR WHICH THE INTERMITTENT
LEAVE IS NECESSARY.
(3) AN EMPLOYEE MAY NOT TAKE INTERMITTENT LEAVE IN AN
INCREMENT OF LESS THAN 4 HOURS.
(4) IF LEAVE IS TAKEN ON AN INTERMITTENT LEAVE SCHEDULE, AN
APPOINTING AUTHORITY MAY NOT REDUCE THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF LEAVE TO
WHICH THE EMPLOYEE IS ENTITLED MAY NOT BE REDUCED BEYOND THE AMOUNT
OF LEAVE ACTUALLY TAKEN.
(D) AN EMPLOYEE MAY APPEAL A DENIAL OF LEAVE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THE APPEAL PROCEDURES ESTABLISHED BY THE SECRETARY OF LABOR FOR THE
FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE INSURANCE PROGRAM.
9–1005.
(A) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
AN EMPLOYEE MAY NOT RECEIVE MORE THAN 12 WEEKS OF LEAVE IN AN
APPLICATION YEAR.
– 7 –

Ch. 606 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) AN EMPLOYEE MAY RECEIVE AN ADDITIONAL 12 WEEKS OF LEAVE
IF THE EMPLOYEE DURING THE SAME APPLICATION YEAR:
(I) 1. RECEIVED LEAVE BECAUSE THE EMPLOYEE WAS
ELIGIBLE FOR LEAVE UNDER § 9–1004(A)(1)(I) OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
2. BECOMES ELIGIBLE FOR LEAVE UNDER §
9–1004(A)(1)(III) OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(II) 1. RECEIVED LEAVE BECAUSE THE EMPLOYEE WAS
ELIGIBLE FOR LEAVE UNDER § 9–1004(A)(1)(III) OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
2. BECOMES ELIGIBLE FOR LEAVE UNDER §
9–1004(A)(1)(I) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) IF AN EMPLOYEE TAKES LEAVE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, THE LEAVE
SHALL RUN CONCURRENTLY WITH ELIGIBLE LEAVE THAT MAY BE TAKEN BY THE
EMPLOYEE UNDER THE FEDERAL FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE ACT.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT EMPLOYEE’S APPOINTING AUTHORITY MAY COUNT
THE LEAVE TAKEN UNDER THE FEDERAL FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE ACT MAY BE
COUNTED AGAINST AN EMPLOYEE’S MAXIMUM DURATION OF LEAVE AVAILABLE
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IN AN APPLICATION YEAR FOR THE SAME PURPOSE, IF:
(1) THE DEPARTMENT EMPLOYEE’S APPOINTING AUTHORITY
DESIGNATES A PERIOD OF LEAVE IS DESIGNATED AS COVERED BY THE FEDERAL
FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE ACT FOR AN EMPLOYEE WHO WOULD ALSO QUALIFY
FOR LEAVE UNDER § 9–1004(A)(1) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) THE DEPARTMENT EMPLOYEE’S APPOINTING AUTHORITY
NOTIFIES THE EMPLOYEE IS NOTIFIED OF THE EMPLOYEE’S ELIGIBILITY FOR LEAVE
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(3) THE EMPLOYEE DECLINES TO APPLY FOR LEAVE UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE.
(D) AN EMPLOYEE MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO USE OR EXHAUST PAID
VACATION, PAID SICK LEAVE, OR OTHER PAID TIME OFF PROVIDED TO THE
EMPLOYEE BEFORE, OR WHILE, TAKING LEAVE UNDER THIS TITLE.
[9–1001.] 9–1006.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 606
(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, the Secretary shall adopt regulations,
guidelines, or policies implementing the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993.
(b) The regulations adopted by the Secretary:
(1) may require an eligible employee to use other available accrued leave
concurrently with family and medical leave; and
(2) may not limit, to less than 24 weeks, the aggregate number of weeks of
family and medical leave that two employees who are married to one another may use
during a 12–month period for:
(i) the birth of the employees’ child;
(ii) the placement of a child with the employees for adoption or foster
care;
(iii) the serious health condition of the employees’ child, if the child
is a minor; or
(iv) the care of the employees’ adult child, if the adult child is
incapable of self–care.
[9–1108.
(a) This section applies to all employees in the executive branch of State
government.
(b) On request, an employee subject to this section may be entitled to parental
leave with pay.
(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, an employee who is the
primary caregiver responsible for the care and nurturing of a child may use up to 60 days
of parental leave to care for the child during the period immediately following:
(i) the birth of the employee’s child; or
(ii) the placement of the child under 6 years of age with the employee
for adoption.
(2) (i) An employee entitled to parental leave authorized under
paragraph (1) of this subsection may use accrued annual leave and personal leave available
to the employee.
– 9 –

Ch. 606 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) If the amount of leave specified under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph is less than 60 days, the State agency that employs the employee shall provide
the employee with additional paid leave to attain 60 days of parental leave.
(d) An employee may use parental leave only after obtaining approval from the
employee’s appointing authority.
(e) (1) An employee who uses parental leave following the birth of the
employee’s child may not receive payment under this section unless the employee gives the
employee’s immediate supervisor information required by guidelines issued by the
Secretary on the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993.
(2) An employee who uses parental leave for adoption purposes may not
receive payment under this subtitle unless the employee gives the employee’s immediate
supervisor the certificate required by guidelines issued by the Secretary on the federal
Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993.
(f) The Secretary shall adopt regulations governing parental leave, including
regulations that establish conditions and procedures for requesting and approving parental
leave.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025 July 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 10 –